Oklahoma, session 2025, SB948.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1911 of Title 25, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The State of Oklahoma hereby adopts the following non-legally


binding working definition of anti-Semitism:


“Anti-Semitism” means a certain perception of Jewish people,


which may be expressed as hatred toward Jewish people. Rhetorical


and physical manifestations of anti-Semitism are directed toward


Jewish or non-Jewish individuals or their property, toward Jewish


community institutions and religious facilities.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 928 Page 1


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-928 TEK 1/19/2025 5:46:32 AM









































Req. No. 928 Page 2